Florida, session 2026, HB245.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
15
16 Section 1. Section 847.0015, Florida Statutes, is created
17 to read:
18 847.0015 Intent; child sexual abuse material;
19 applicability.—
20 (1) It is the intent of the Legislature to change the term
21 "child pornography" to the term "child sexual abuse material"
22 throughout the Florida Statutes. Using the term "child sexual
23 abuse material" represents the nature of the sexually abusive
24 content, emphasizing that the child is a victim of such content.
25 Changing the term "child pornography" to "child sexual abuse
Page 1 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
26 material" is not intended to change or alter in any other way
27 the definition of the term or the elements of any offense
28 relating to child pornography.
29 (2) Any prior judicial interpretation or finding from
30 state or federal case law relating to child pornography must be
31 applied in the same manner to any offense relating to child
32 sexual abuse material.
33 (3) This section applies to any law that uses the term
34 "child sexual abuse material," including in this chapter and
35 chapters 39, 92, 435, 456, 775, 827, 836, 903, 948, and 960.
36 Section 2. Paragraph (c) of subsection (3) of section
37 39.0138, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
38 39.0138 Criminal history and other records checks; limit
39 on placement of a child.—
40 (3) The department may not place a child with a person
41 other than a parent if the criminal history records check
42 reveals that the person has been convicted of any felony that
43 falls within any of the following categories:
44 (c) Child sexual abuse material pornography or other
45 felony in which a child was a victim of the offense; or
46 Section 3. Subsection (3) of section 92.56, Florida
47 Statutes, is amended to read:
48 92.56 Judicial proceedings and court records involving
49 sexual offenses and human trafficking.—
50 (3) The state may use a pseudonym instead of the victim's
Page 2 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
51 name to designate the victim of a crime described in s.
52 787.06(3)(a)1., (c)1., or (e)1., in s. 787.06(3)(b), (d), (f),
53 or (g), or in chapter 794 or chapter 800, or of child abuse,
54 aggravated child abuse, or sexual performance by a child as
55 described in chapter 827, or any crime involving the production,
56 possession, or promotion of child sexual abuse material
57 pornography as described in chapter 847, in all court records
58 and records of court proceedings, both civil and criminal.
59 Section 4. Section 92.561, Florida Statutes, is amended to
60 read:
61 92.561 Prohibition on reproduction of child sexual abuse
62 material pornography.—
63 (1) In a criminal proceeding, any property or material
64 that portrays sexual performance by a child as defined in s.
65 827.071, constitutes generated child sexual abuse material
66 pornography as defined in s. 827.072, or constitutes child
67 sexual abuse material pornography as defined in s. 847.001, must
68 remain secured or locked in the care, custody, and control of a
69 law enforcement agency, the state attorney, or the court.
70 (2) Notwithstanding any law or rule of court, a court
71 shall deny, in a criminal proceeding, any request by the
72 defendant to copy, photograph, duplicate, or otherwise reproduce
73 any property or material that portrays sexual performance by a
74 child, constitutes generated child sexual abuse material
75 pornography, or constitutes child sexual abuse material
Page 3 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
76 pornography so long as the state attorney makes the property or
77 material reasonably available to the defendant.
78 (3) For purposes of this section, property or material is
79 deemed to be reasonably available to the defendant if the state
80 attorney provides ample opportunity at a designated facility for
81 the inspection, viewing, and examination of the property or
82 material that portrays sexual performance by a child,
83 constitutes generated child sexual abuse material pornography,
84 or constitutes child sexual abuse material pornography by the
85 defendant, his or her attorney, or any individual whom the
86 defendant uses as an expert during the discovery process or at a
87 court proceeding.
88 Section 5. Paragraph (c) of subsection (4) of section
89 435.07, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
90 435.07 Exemptions from disqualification.—Unless otherwise
91 provided by law, the provisions of this section apply to
92 exemptions from disqualification for disqualifying offenses
93 revealed pursuant to background screenings required under this
94 chapter, regardless of whether those disqualifying offenses are
95 listed in this chapter or other laws.
96 (4)
97 (c) Disqualification from employment under this chapter
98 may not be removed from, and an exemption may not be granted to,
99 any current or prospective child care personnel, as defined in
100 s. 402.302(3), and such a person is disqualified from employment
Page 4 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
101 as child care personnel, regardless of any previous exemptions
102 from disqualification, if the person has been registered as a
103 sex offender as described in 42 U.S.C. s. 9858f(c)(1)(C) or has
104 been arrested for and is awaiting final disposition of, has been
105 convicted or found guilty of, or entered a plea of guilty or
106 nolo contendere to, regardless of adjudication, or has been
107 adjudicated delinquent and the record has not been sealed or
108 expunged for, any offense prohibited under any of the following
109 provisions of state law or a similar law of another
110 jurisdiction:
111 1. A felony offense prohibited under any of the following
112 statutes:
113 a. Chapter 741, relating to domestic violence.
114 b. Section 782.04, relating to murder.
115 c. Section 782.07, relating to manslaughter; aggravated
116 manslaughter of an elderly person or disabled adult; aggravated
117 manslaughter of a child; or aggravated manslaughter of an
118 officer, a firefighter, an emergency medical technician, or a
119 paramedic.
120 d. Section 784.021, relating to aggravated assault.
121 e. Section 784.045, relating to aggravated battery.
122 f. Section 787.01, relating to kidnapping.
123 g. Section 787.025, relating to luring or enticing a
124 child.
125 h. Section 787.04(2), relating to leading, taking,
Page 5 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
126 enticing, or removing a minor beyond the state limits, or
127 concealing the location of a minor, with criminal intent pending
128 custody proceedings.
129 i. Section 787.04(3), relating to leading, taking,
130 enticing, or removing a minor beyond the state limits, or
131 concealing the location of a minor, with criminal intent pending
132 dependency proceedings or proceedings concerning alleged abuse
133 or neglect of a minor.
134 j. Section 794.011, relating to sexual battery.
135 k. Former s. 794.041, relating to sexual activity with or
136 solicitation of a child by a person in familial or custodial
137 authority.
138 l. Section 794.05, relating to unlawful sexual activity
139 with certain minors.
140 m. Section 794.08, relating to female genital mutilation.
141 n. Section 806.01, relating to arson.
142 o. Section 826.04, relating to incest.
143 p. Section 827.03, relating to child abuse, aggravated
144 child abuse, or neglect of a child.
145 q. Section 827.04, relating to contributing to the
146 delinquency or dependency of a child.
147 r. Section 827.071, relating to sexual performance by a
148 child.
149 s. Chapter 847, relating to child sexual abuse material
150 pornography.
Page 6 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
151 t. Chapter 893, relating to a drug abuse prevention and
152 control offense, if that offense was committed in the preceding
153 5 years.
154 u. Section 985.701, relating to sexual misconduct in
155 juvenile justice programs.
156 2. A misdemeanor offense prohibited under any of the
157 following statutes:
158 a. Section 784.03, relating to battery, if the victim of
159 the offense was a minor.
160 b. Section 787.025, relating to luring or enticing a
161 child.
162 c. Chapter 847, relating to child sexual abuse material
163 pornography.
164 3. A criminal act committed in another state or under
165 federal law which, if committed in this state, constitutes an
166 offense prohibited under any statute listed in subparagraph 1.
167 or subparagraph 2.
168 Section 6. Paragraph (aa) of subsection (5) of section
169 456.074, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
170 456.074 Certain health care practitioners; immediate
171 suspension of license.—
172 (5) The department shall issue an emergency order
173 suspending the license of any health care practitioner who is
174 arrested for committing or attempting, soliciting, or conspiring
175 to commit any act that would constitute a violation of any of
Page 7 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
176 the following criminal offenses in this state or similar
177 offenses in another jurisdiction:
178 (aa) Section 847.0137, relating to the transmission of
179 child sexual abuse material pornography by electronic device or
180 equipment.
181 Section 7. Paragraph (b) of subsection (1) and paragraph
182 (a) of subsection (2) of section 775.0847, Florida Statutes, are
183 amended to read:
184 775.0847 Possession or promotion of certain images of
185 child sexual abuse material pornography; reclassification.—
186 (1) For purposes of this section:
187 (b) "Child sexual abuse material pornography" means:
188 1. Any image depicting a minor engaged in sexual conduct;
189 or
190 2. Any image that has been created, altered, adapted, or
191 modified by electronic, mechanical, or other means, to portray
192 an identifiable minor engaged in sexual conduct.
193 (2) A violation of s. 827.071, s. 847.0135, s. 847.0137,
194 or s. 847.0138 shall be reclassified to the next higher degree
195 as provided in subsection (3) if:
196 (a) The offender possesses 10 or more images of any form
197 of child sexual abuse material pornography regardless of
198 content; and
199
200 For purposes of sentencing under chapter 921 and determining
Page 8 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
201 incentive gain-time eligibility under chapter 944, a felony
202 offense that is reclassified under this section is ranked one
203 level above the ranking under s. 921.0022 or s. 921.0023 of the
204 offense committed.
205 Section 8. Paragraph (b) of subsection (1), subsection
206 (4), and paragraph (a) of subsection (5) of section 827.071,
207 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
208 827.071 Sexual performance by a child; child sexual abuse
209 material pornography; penalties.—
210 (1) As used in this section, the following definitions
211 shall apply:
212 (b) "Child sexual abuse material pornography" means:
213 1. Any image depicting a minor engaged in sexual conduct;
214 or
215 2. Any image that has been created, altered, adapted, or
216 modified by electronic, mechanical, or other means, to portray
217 an identifiable minor engaged in sexual conduct.
218 (4) It is unlawful for any person to possess with the
219 intent to promote any photograph, motion picture, exhibition,
220 show, representation, or other presentation which, in whole or
221 in part, includes child sexual abuse material pornography. The
222 possession of three or more copies of such photograph, motion
223 picture, representation, or presentation is prima facie evidence
224 of an intent to promote. A person who violates this subsection
225 commits a felony of the second degree, punishable as provided in
Page 9 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
226 s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
227 (5)(a) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly solicit,
228 possess, control, or intentionally view a photograph, motion
229 picture, exhibition, show, representation, image, data, computer
230 depiction, or other presentation which, in whole or in part, he
231 or she knows to include child sexual abuse material pornography.
232 The solicitation, possession, control, or intentional viewing of
233 each such photograph, motion picture, exhibition, show, image,
234 data, computer depiction, representation, or presentation is a
235 separate offense. If such photograph, motion picture,
236 exhibition, show, representation, image, data, computer
237 depiction, or other presentation includes child sexual abuse
238 material pornography depicting more than one child, then each
239 such child in each such photograph, motion picture, exhibition,
240 show, representation, image, data, computer depiction, or other
241 presentation that is knowingly solicited, possessed, controlled,
242 or intentionally viewed is a separate offense. A person who
243 violates this paragraph commits a felony of the third degree,
244 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
245 Section 9. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) and paragraphs
246 (a) and (b) of subsection (2) of section 827.072, Florida
247 Statutes, are amended to read:
248 827.072 Generated child sexual abuse material
249 pornography.—
250 (1) As used in this section, the term:
Page 10 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
251 (a) "Generated child sexual abuse material pornography"
252 means any image that has been created, altered, adapted, or
253 modified by electronic, mechanical, or other computer-generated
254 means to portray a fictitious person, who a reasonable person
255 would regard as being a real person younger than 18 years of
256 age, engaged in sexual conduct.
257 (2)(a) It is unlawful for a person to knowingly possess or
258 control or intentionally view a photograph, a motion picture, a
259 representation, an image, a data file, a computer depiction, or
260 any other presentation which, in whole or in part, he or she
261 knows includes generated child sexual abuse material
262 pornography. The possession, control, or intentional viewing of
263 each such photograph, motion picture, representation, image,
264 data file, computer depiction, or other presentation is a
265 separate offense. A person who violates this paragraph commits a
266 felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in s.
267 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
268 (b) A person who intentionally creates generated child
269 sexual abuse material pornography commits a felony of the third
270 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s.
271 775.084.
272 Section 10. Subsection (11) of section 836.13, Florida
273 Statutes, is amended to read:
274 836.13 Altered sexual depictions; prohibited acts;
275 penalties; applicability.—
Page 11 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
276 (11) Prosecution of a person for an offense under this
277 section does not preclude prosecution of that person in this
278 state for a violation of any other law of this state, including
279 a law providing for greater penalties than prescribed in this
280 section or any other crime related to child sexual abuse
281 material pornography or the sexual performance or the sexual
282 exploitation of children.
283 Section 11. Subsection (9) of section 836.14, Florida
284 Statutes, is amended to read:
285 836.14 Theft or unauthorized promotion of a sexually
286 explicit image.—
287 (9) Prosecution of a person for an offense under this
288 section does not preclude prosecution of that person in this
289 state for a violation of any other law of this state, including
290 a law providing for greater penalties than prescribed in this
291 section or any other crime related to child sexual abuse
292 material pornography or the sexual performance or the sexual
293 exploitation of children.
294 Section 12. Subsection (3) of section 847.001, Florida
295 Statutes, is amended to read:
296 847.001 Definitions.—As used in this chapter, the term:
297 (3) "Child sexual abuse material pornography" means:
298 (a) Any image depicting a minor engaged in sexual conduct;
299 or
300 (b) Any image that has been created, altered, adapted, or
Page 12 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
301 modified by electronic, mechanical, or other means, to portray
302 an identifiable minor engaged in sexual conduct.
303 Section 13. Section 847.002, Florida Statutes, is amended
304 to read:
305 847.002 Child sexual abuse material pornography
306 prosecutions.—
307 (1) Any law enforcement officer who, pursuant to a
308 criminal investigation, recovers images or movies of child
309 sexual abuse material pornography shall:
310 (a) Provide such images or movies to the law enforcement
311 agency representative assigned to the Child Victim
312 Identification Program at the National Center for Missing and
313 Exploited Children, as required by the center's guidelines.
314 (b) Request the law enforcement agency contact information
315 from the Child Victim Identification Program for any images or
316 movies recovered which contain an identified victim of child
317 sexual abuse material pornography as defined in s. 960.03.
318 (c) Provide case information to the Child Victim
319 Identification Program, as required by the National Center for
320 Missing and Exploited Children guidelines, in any case where the
321 law enforcement officer identifies a previously unidentified
322 victim of child sexual abuse material pornography.
323 (2) Any law enforcement officer submitting a case for
324 prosecution which involves the production, promotion, or
325 possession of child sexual abuse material pornography shall
Page 13 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
326 submit to the designated prosecutor the law enforcement agency
327 contact information provided by the Child Victim Identification
328 Program at the National Center for Missing and Exploited
329 Children, for any images or movies involved in the case which
330 contain the depiction of an identified victim of child sexual
331 abuse material pornography as defined in s. 960.03.
332 (3) In every filed case involving an identified victim of
333 child sexual abuse material pornography, as defined in s.
334 960.03, the prosecuting agency shall enter the following
335 information into the Victims in Child Pornography Tracking
336 Repeat Exploitation database maintained by the Office of the
337 Attorney General:
338 (a) The case number and agency file number.
339 (b) The named defendant.
340 (c) The circuit court division and county.
341 (d) Current court dates and the status of the case.
342 (e) Contact information for the prosecutor assigned.
343 (f) Verification that the prosecutor is or is not in
344 possession of a victim impact statement and will use the
345 statement in sentencing.
346 Section 14. Subsections (1) and (4) of section 847.01357,
347 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
348 847.01357 Exploited children's civil remedy.—
349 (1) Any person who, while under the age of 18, was a
350 victim of a sexual abuse crime listed in chapter 794, chapter
Page 14 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
351 800, chapter 827, or chapter 847, where any portion of such
352 abuse was used in the production of child sexual abuse material
353 pornography, and who suffers personal or psychological injury as
354 a result of the production, promotion, or possession of such
355 images or movies, may bring an action in an appropriate state
356 court against the producer, promoter, or possessor of such
357 images or movies, regardless of whether the victim is now an
358 adult. In any action brought under this section, a prevailing
359 plaintiff shall recover the actual damages such person sustained
360 and the cost of the suit, including reasonable attorney's fees.
361 Any victim who is awarded damages under this section shall be
362 deemed to have sustained damages of at least $150,000.
363 (4) It is not a defense to a civil cause of action under
364 this section that the respondent did not know the victim or
365 commit the abuse depicted in any image of child sexual abuse
366 material pornography.
367 Section 15. Subsections (2), (3), and (4) of section
368 847.0137, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
369 847.0137 Transmission of child sexual abuse material
370 pornography by electronic device or equipment prohibited;
371 penalties.—
372 (2) Notwithstanding ss. 847.012 and 847.0133, any person
373 in this state who knew or reasonably should have known that he
374 or she was transmitting child sexual abuse material pornography,
375 as defined in s. 847.001, to another person in this state or in
Page 15 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
376 another jurisdiction commits a felony of the third degree,
377 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
378 (3) Notwithstanding ss. 847.012 and 847.0133, any person
379 in any jurisdiction other than this state who knew or reasonably
380 should have known that he or she was transmitting child sexual
381 abuse material pornography, as defined in s. 847.001, to any
382 person in this state commits a felony of the third degree,
383 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
384 (4) This section shall not be construed to preclude
385 prosecution of a person in this state or another jurisdiction
386 for a violation of any law of this state, including a law
387 providing for greater penalties than prescribed in this section,
388 for the transmission of child sexual abuse material pornography,
389 as defined in s. 847.001, to any person in this state.
390
391 The provisions of this section do not apply to subscription-
392 based transmissions such as list servers.
393 Section 16. Section 847.0139, Florida Statutes, is amended
394 to read:
395 847.0139 Immunity from civil liability for reporting child
396 sexual abuse material pornography, transmission of child sexual
397 abuse material pornography, or any image, information, or data
398 harmful to minors to a minor in this state.—Any person who
399 reports to a law enforcement officer what the person reasonably
400 believes to be child sexual abuse material pornography,
Page 16 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
401 transmission of child sexual abuse material pornography, or any
402 image, information, or data that is harmful to minors to a minor
403 in this state may not be held civilly liable for such reporting.
404 For purposes of this section, such reporting may include
405 furnishing the law enforcement officer with any image,
406 information, or data that the person reasonably believes to be
407 evidence of child sexual abuse material pornography,
408 transmission of child sexual abuse material pornography, or an
409 image, information, or data that is harmful to minors to a minor
410 in this state.
411 Section 17. Paragraph (g) of subsection (6) of section
412 903.011, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
413 903.011 Pretrial release; general terms; statewide uniform
414 bond schedule.—
415 (6) A person may not be released before his or her first
416 appearance hearing or bail determination and a judge must
417 determine the appropriate bail, if any, based on an
418 individualized consideration of the criteria in s. 903.046(2),
419 if the person meets any of the following criteria:
420 (g) The person's current offense of arrest is for one or
421 more of the following crimes:
422 1. A capital felony, life felony, felony of the first
423 degree, or felony of the second degree;
424 2. A homicide under chapter 782; or any attempt,
425 solicitation, or conspiracy to commit a homicide;
Page 17 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
426 3. Assault in furtherance of a riot or an aggravated riot;
427 felony battery; domestic battery by strangulation; domestic
428 violence, as defined in s. 741.28; stalking; mob intimidation;
429 assault or battery on a law enforcement officer; assault or
430 battery on juvenile probation officer, or other staff of a
431 detention center or commitment facility, or a staff member of a
432 commitment facility, or health services personnel; assault or
433 battery on a person 65 years of age or older; robbery; burglary;
434 carjacking; or resisting an officer with violence;
435 4. Kidnapping, false imprisonment, human trafficking, or
436 human smuggling;
437 5. Possession of a firearm or ammunition by a felon,
438 violent career criminal, or person subject to an injunction
439 against committing acts of domestic violence, stalking, or
440 cyberstalking;
441 6. Sexual battery; indecent, lewd, or lascivious touching;
442 exposure of sexual organs; incest; luring or enticing a child;
443 or child sexual abuse material pornography;
444 7. Abuse, neglect, or exploitation of an elderly person or
445 disabled adult;
446 8. Child abuse or aggravated child abuse;
447 9. Arson; riot, aggravated riot, inciting a riot, or
448 aggravated inciting a riot; or a burglary or theft during a
449 riot;
450 10. Escape; tampering or retaliating against a witness,
Page 18 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
451 victim, or informant; destruction of evidence; or tampering with
452 a jury;
453 11. Any offense committed for the purpose of benefiting,
454 promoting, or furthering the interests of a criminal gang;
455 12. Trafficking in a controlled substance, including
456 conspiracy to engage in trafficking in a controlled substance;
457 13. Racketeering; or
458 14. Failure to appear at required court proceedings while
459 on bail.
460 Section 18. Paragraphs (e), (f), and (g) of subsection (3)
461 of section 921.0022, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
462 921.0022 Criminal Punishment Code; offense severity
463 ranking chart.—
464 (3) OFFENSE SEVERITY RANKING CHART
465 (e) LEVEL 5
Florida Felony
Statute Degree Description
466
316.027(2)(a) 3rd Accidents involving personal
injuries other than serious
bodily injury, failure to stop;
leaving scene.
467
316.1935(3)(a) 2nd Driving at high speed or with
wanton disregard for safety
Page 19 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
while fleeing or attempting to
elude law enforcement officer
who is in a patrol vehicle with
siren and lights activated.
468
316.80(2) 2nd Unlawful conveyance of fuel;
obtaining fuel fraudulently.
469
322.34(6) 3rd Careless operation of motor
vehicle with suspended license,
resulting in death or serious
bodily injury.
470
327.30(5)(a)2. 3rd Vessel accidents involving
personal injuries other than
serious bodily injury; leaving
scene.
471
365.172 2nd Misuse of emergency
(14)(b)2. communications system resulting
in death.
472
379.365(2)(c)1. 3rd Violation of rules relating to:
willful molestation of stone
crab traps, lines, or buoys;
Page 20 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
illegal bartering, trading, or
sale, conspiring or aiding in
such barter, trade, or sale, or
supplying, agreeing to supply,
aiding in supplying, or giving
away stone crab trap tags or
certificates; making, altering,
forging, counterfeiting, or
reproducing stone crab trap
tags; possession of forged,
counterfeit, or imitation stone
crab trap tags; and engaging in
the commercial harvest of stone
crabs while license is
suspended or revoked.
473
379.367(4) 3rd Willful molestation of a
commercial harvester's spiny
lobster trap, line, or buoy.
474
379.407(5)(b)3. 3rd Possession of 100 or more
undersized spiny lobsters.
475
381.0041(11)(b) 3rd Donate blood, plasma, or organs
knowing HIV positive.
Page 21 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
476
440.10(1)(g) 2nd Failure to obtain workers'
compensation coverage.
477
440.105(5) 2nd Unlawful solicitation for the
purpose of making workers'
compensation claims.
478
440.381(2) 3rd Submission of false,
misleading, or incomplete
information with the purpose of
avoiding or reducing workers'
compensation premiums.
479
624.401(4)(b)2. 2nd Transacting insurance without a
certificate or authority;
premium collected $20,000 or
more but less than $100,000.
480
626.902(1)(c) 2nd Representing an unauthorized
insurer; repeat offender.
481
790.01(3) 3rd Unlawful carrying of a
concealed firearm.
482
Page 22 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
790.162 2nd Threat to throw or discharge
destructive device.
483
790.163(1) 2nd False report of bomb,
explosive, weapon of mass
destruction, or use of firearms
in violent manner.
484
790.221(1) 2nd Possession of short-barreled
shotgun or machine gun.
485
790.23 2nd Felons in possession of
firearms, ammunition, or
electronic weapons or devices.
486
796.05(1) 2nd Live on earnings of a
prostitute; 1st offense.
487
800.04(6)(c) 3rd Lewd or lascivious conduct;
offender less than 18 years of
age.
488
800.04(7)(b) 2nd Lewd or lascivious exhibition;
offender 18 years of age or
older.
Page 23 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
489
806.111(1) 3rd Possess, manufacture, or
dispense fire bomb with intent
to damage any structure or
property.
490
810.145(4) 3rd Commercial digital voyeurism
dissemination.
491
810.145(7)(a) 2nd Digital voyeurism; 2nd or
subsequent offense.
492
810.145(8)(a) 2nd Digital voyeurism; certain
minor victims.
493
812.014(2)(d)3. 2nd Grand theft, 2nd degree; theft
from 20 or more dwellings or
their unenclosed curtilage, or
any combination.
494
812.0145(2)(b) 2nd Theft from person 65 years of
age or older; $10,000 or more
but less than $50,000.
495
812.015 3rd Retail theft; property stolen
Page 24 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
(8)(a) & (c)- is valued at $750 or more and
(e) one or more specified acts.
496
812.015(8)(f) 3rd Retail theft; multiple thefts
within specified period.
497
812.015(8)(g) 3rd Retail theft; committed with
specified number of other
persons.
498
812.019(1) 2nd Stolen property; dealing in or
trafficking in.
499
812.081(3) 2nd Trafficking in trade secrets.
500
812.131(2)(b) 3rd Robbery by sudden snatching.
501
812.16(2) 3rd Owning, operating, or
conducting a chop shop.
502
817.034(4)(a)2. 2nd Communications fraud, value
$20,000 to $50,000.
503
817.234(11)(b) 2nd Insurance fraud; property value
$20,000 or more but less than
Page 25 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
$100,000.
504
817.2341(1), 3rd Filing false financial
(2)(a) & statements, making false
(3)(a) entries of material fact or
false statements regarding
property values relating to the
solvency of an insuring entity.
505
817.568(2)(b) 2nd Fraudulent use of personal
identification information;
value of benefit, services
received, payment avoided, or
amount of injury or fraud,
$5,000 or more or use of
personal identification
information of 10 or more
persons.
506
817.611(2)(a) 2nd Traffic in or possess 5 to 14
counterfeit credit cards or
related documents.
507
817.625(2)(b) 2nd Second or subsequent fraudulent
use of scanning device,
Page 26 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
skimming device, or reencoder.
508
825.1025(4) 3rd Lewd or lascivious exhibition
in the presence of an elderly
person or disabled adult.
509
828.12(2) 3rd Tortures any animal with intent
to inflict intense pain,
serious physical injury, or
death.
510
836.14(4) 2nd Person who willfully promotes
for financial gain a sexually
explicit image of an
identifiable person without
consent.
511
839.13(2)(b) 2nd Falsifying records of an
individual in the care and
custody of a state agency
involving great bodily harm or
death.
512
843.01(1) 3rd Resist officer with violence to
person; resist arrest with
Page 27 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
violence.
513
847.0135(5)(b) 2nd Lewd or lascivious exhibition
using computer; offender 18
years or older.
514
847.0137 3rd Transmission of child sexual
(2) & (3) abuse material pornography by
electronic device or equipment.
515
847.0138 3rd Transmission of material
(2) & (3) harmful to minors to a minor by
electronic device or equipment.
516
874.05(1)(b) 2nd Encouraging or recruiting
another to join a criminal
gang; second or subsequent
offense.
517
874.05(2)(a) 2nd Encouraging or recruiting
person under 13 years of age to
join a criminal gang.
518
893.13(1)(a)1. 2nd Sell, manufacture, or deliver
cocaine (or other s.
Page 28 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d),
(2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5.
drugs).
519
893.13(1)(c)2. 2nd Sell, manufacture, or deliver
cannabis (or other s.
893.03(1)(c), (2)(c)1.,
(2)(c)2., (2)(c)3., (2)(c)6.,
(2)(c)7., (2)(c)8., (2)(c)9.,
(2)(c)10., (3), or (4) drugs)
within 1,000 feet of a child
care facility, school, or
state, county, or municipal
park or publicly owned
recreational facility or
community center.
520
893.13(1)(d)1. 1st Sell, manufacture, or deliver
cocaine (or other s.
893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d),
(2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5.
drugs) within 1,000 feet of
university.
521
893.13(1)(e)2. 2nd Sell, manufacture, or deliver
Page 29 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
cannabis or other drug
prohibited under s.
893.03(1)(c), (2)(c)1.,
(2)(c)2., (2)(c)3., (2)(c)6.,
(2)(c)7., (2)(c)8., (2)(c)9.,
(2)(c)10., (3), or (4) within
1,000 feet of property used for
religious services or a
specified business site.
522
893.13(1)(f)1. 1st Sell, manufacture, or deliver
cocaine (or other s.
893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d),
or (2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5.
drugs) within 1,000 feet of
public housing facility.
523
893.13(4)(b) 2nd Use or hire of minor; deliver
to minor other controlled
substance.
524
893.1351(1) 3rd Ownership, lease, or rental for
trafficking in or manufacturing
of controlled substance.
525
Page 30 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
526 (f) LEVEL 6
527
Florida Felony
Statute Degree Description
528
316.027(2)(b) 2nd Leaving the scene of a crash
involving serious bodily
injury.
529
316.193(2)(b) 3rd Felony DUI, 4th or subsequent
conviction.
530
316.1935(4)(a) 2nd Aggravated fleeing or eluding.
531
327.30(5)(a)3. 2nd Vessel accidents involving
serious bodily injury; leaving
scene.
532
400.9935(4)(c) 2nd Operating a clinic, or offering
services requiring licensure,
without a license.
533
499.0051(2) 2nd Knowing forgery of transaction
history, transaction
information, or transaction
Page 31 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
statement.
534
499.0051(3) 2nd Knowing purchase or receipt of
prescription drug from
unauthorized person.
535
499.0051(4) 2nd Knowing sale or transfer of
prescription drug to
unauthorized person.
536
775.0875(1) 3rd Taking firearm from law
enforcement officer.
537
784.021(1)(a) 3rd Aggravated assault; deadly
weapon without intent to kill.
538
784.021(1)(b) 3rd Aggravated assault; intent to
commit felony.
539
784.041 3rd Felony battery; domestic
battery by strangulation.
540
784.048(3) 3rd Aggravated stalking; credible
threat.
541
Page 32 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
784.048(5) 3rd Aggravated stalking of person
under 16.
542
784.07(2)(c) 2nd Aggravated assault on law
enforcement officer.
543
784.074(1)(b) 2nd Aggravated assault on sexually
violent predators facility
staff.
544
784.08(2)(b) 2nd Aggravated assault on a person
65 years of age or older.
545
784.081(2) 2nd Aggravated assault on specified
official or employee.
546
784.082(2) 2nd Aggravated assault by detained
person on visitor or other
detainee.
547
784.083(2) 2nd Aggravated assault on code
inspector.
548
787.02(2) 3rd False imprisonment; restraining
with purpose other than those
Page 33 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
in s. 787.01.
549
787.025(2)(a) 3rd Luring or enticing a child.
550
790.115(2)(d) 2nd Discharging firearm or weapon
on school property.
551
790.161(2) 2nd Make, possess, or throw
destructive device with intent
to do bodily harm or damage
property.
552
790.164(1) 2nd False report concerning bomb,
explosive, weapon of mass
destruction, act of arson or
violence to state property, or
use of firearms in violent
manner.
553
790.19 2nd Shooting or throwing deadly
missiles into dwellings,
vessels, or vehicles.
554
794.011(8)(a) 3rd Solicitation of minor to
participate in sexual activity
Page 34 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
by custodial adult.
555
794.05(1) 2nd Unlawful sexual activity with
specified minor.
556
800.04(5)(d) 3rd Lewd or lascivious molestation;
victim 12 years of age or older
but less than 16 years of age;
offender less than 18 years.
557
800.04(6)(b) 2nd Lewd or lascivious conduct;
offender 18 years of age or
older.
558
806.031(2) 2nd Arson resulting in great bodily
harm to firefighter or any
other person.
559
810.02(3)(c) 2nd Burglary of occupied structure;
unarmed; no assault or battery.
560
810.145(8)(b) 2nd Digital voyeurism; certain
minor victims; 2nd or
subsequent offense.
561
Page 35 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
812.014(2)(b)1. 2nd Property stolen $20,000 or
more, but less than $100,000,
grand theft in 2nd degree.
562
812.014(2)(c)5. 3rd Grand theft; third degree;
firearm.
563
812.014(6) 2nd Theft; property stolen $3,000
or more; coordination of
others.
564
812.015(9)(a) 2nd Retail theft; property stolen
$750 or more; second or
subsequent conviction.
565
812.015(9)(b) 2nd Retail theft; aggregated
property stolen within 120 days
is $3,000 or more; coordination
of others.
566
812.015(9)(d) 2nd Retail theft; multiple thefts
within specified period.
567
812.015(9)(e) 2nd Retail theft; committed with
specified number of other
Page 36 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
persons and use of social media
platform.
568
812.13(2)(c) 2nd Robbery, no firearm or other
weapon (strong-arm robbery).
569
817.4821(5) 2nd Possess cloning paraphernalia
with intent to create cloned
cellular telephones.
570
817.49(2)(b)2. 2nd Willful making of a false
report of a crime resulting in
death.
571
817.505(4)(b) 2nd Patient brokering; 10 or more
patients.
572
817.5695(3)(b) 2nd Exploitation of person 65 years
of age or older, value $10,000
or more, but less than $50,000.
573
825.102(1) 3rd Abuse of an elderly person or
disabled adult.
574
825.102(3)(c) 3rd Neglect of an elderly person or
Page 37 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
disabled adult.
575
825.1025(3) 3rd Lewd or lascivious molestation
of an elderly person or
disabled adult.
576
825.103(3)(c) 3rd Exploiting an elderly person or
disabled adult and property is
valued at less than $10,000.
577
827.03(2)(c) 3rd Abuse of a child.
578
827.03(2)(d) 3rd Neglect of a child.
579
827.071(5) 3rd Possess, control, or
intentionally view any
photographic material, motion
picture, etc., which includes
child sexual abuse material
pornography.
580
828.126(3) 3rd Sexual activities involving
animals.
581
836.05 2nd Threats; extortion.
Page 38 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
582
836.10 2nd Written or electronic threats
to kill, do bodily injury, or
conduct a mass shooting or an
act of terrorism.
583
843.12 3rd Aids or assists person to
escape.
584
847.011 3rd Distributing, offering to
distribute, or possessing with
intent to distribute obscene
materials depicting minors.
585
847.012 3rd Knowingly using a minor in the
production of materials harmful
to minors.
586
847.0135(2) 3rd Facilitates sexual conduct of
or with a minor or the visual
depiction of such conduct.
587
893.131 2nd Distribution of controlled
substances resulting in
overdose or serious bodily
Page 39 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
injury.
588
914.23 2nd Retaliation against a witness,
victim, or informant, with
bodily injury.
589
918.13(2)(b) 2nd Tampering with or fabricating
physical evidence relating to a
capital felony.
590
944.35(3)(a)2. 3rd Committing malicious battery
upon or inflicting cruel or
inhuman treatment on an inmate
or offender on community
supervision, resulting in great
bodily harm.
591
944.40 2nd Escapes.
592
944.46 3rd Harboring, concealing, aiding
escaped prisoners.
593
944.47(1)(a)5. 2nd Introduction of contraband
(firearm, weapon, or explosive)
into correctional facility.
Page 40 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
594
951.22(1)(i) 3rd Firearm or weapon introduced
into county detention facility.
595
596 (g) LEVEL 7
597
Florida Felony
Statute Degree Description
598
316.027(2)(c) 1st Accident involving death,
failure to stop; leaving scene.
599
316.193(3)(c)2. 3rd DUI resulting in serious bodily
injury.
600
316.1935(3)(b) 1st Causing serious bodily injury
or death to another person;
driving at high speed or with
wanton disregard for safety
while fleeing or attempting to
elude law enforcement officer
who is in a patrol vehicle with
siren and lights activated.
601
327.35(3)(a)3.b. 3rd Vessel BUI resulting in serious
Page 41 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
bodily injury.
602
402.319(2) 2nd Misrepresentation and
negligence or intentional act
resulting in great bodily harm,
permanent disfiguration,
permanent disability, or death.
603
409.920 3rd Medicaid provider fraud;
(2)(b)1.a. $10,000 or less.
604
409.920 2nd Medicaid provider fraud; more
(2)(b)1.b. than $10,000, but less than
$50,000.
605
456.065(2) 3rd Practicing a health care
profession without a license.
606
456.065(2) 2nd Practicing a health care
profession without a license
which results in serious bodily
injury.
607
458.327(1) 3rd Practicing medicine without a
license.
Page 42 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
608
459.013(1) 3rd Practicing osteopathic medicine
without a license.
609
460.411(1) 3rd Practicing chiropractic
medicine without a license.
610
461.012(1) 3rd Practicing podiatric medicine
without a license.
611
462.17 3rd Practicing naturopathy without
a license.
612
463.015(1) 3rd Practicing optometry without a
license.
613
464.016(1) 3rd Practicing nursing without a
license.
614
465.015(2) 3rd Practicing pharmacy without a
license.
615
466.026(1) 3rd Practicing dentistry or dental
hygiene without a license.
616
Page 43 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
467.201 3rd Practicing midwifery without a
license.
617
468.366 3rd Delivering respiratory care
services without a license.
618
483.828(1) 3rd Practicing as clinical
laboratory personnel without a
license.
619
483.901(7) 3rd Practicing medical physics
without a license.
620
484.013(1)(c) 3rd Preparing or dispensing optical
devices without a prescription.
621
484.053 3rd Dispensing hearing aids without
a license.
622
494.0018(2) 1st Conviction of any violation of
chapter 494 in which the total
money and property unlawfully
obtained exceeded $50,000 and
there were five or more
victims.
Page 44 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
623
560.123(8)(b)1. 3rd Failure to report currency or
payment instruments exceeding
$300 but less than $20,000 by a
money services business.
624
560.125(5)(a) 3rd Money services business by
unauthorized person, currency
or payment instruments
exceeding $300 but less than
$20,000.
625
655.50(10)(b)1. 3rd Failure to report financial
transactions exceeding $300 but
less than $20,000 by financial
institution.
626
775.21(10)(a) 3rd Sexual predator; failure to
register; failure to renew
driver license or
identification card; other
registration violations.
627
775.21(10)(b) 3rd Sexual predator working where
children regularly congregate.
Page 45 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
628
775.21(10)(g) 3rd Failure to report or providing
false information about a
sexual predator; harbor or
conceal a sexual predator.
629
782.051(3) 2nd Attempted felony murder of a
person by a person other than
the perpetrator or the
perpetrator of an attempted
felony.
630
782.07(1) 2nd Killing of a human being by the
act, procurement, or culpable
negligence of another
(manslaughter).
631
782.071 2nd Killing of a human being or
unborn child by the operation
of a motor vehicle in a
reckless manner (vehicular
homicide).
632
782.072 2nd Killing of a human being by the
operation of a vessel in a
Page 46 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
reckless manner (vessel
homicide).
633
784.045(1)(a)1. 2nd Aggravated battery;
intentionally causing great
bodily harm or disfigurement.
634
784.045(1)(a)2. 2nd Aggravated battery; using
deadly weapon.
635
784.045(1)(b) 2nd Aggravated battery; perpetrator
aware victim pregnant.
636
784.048(4) 3rd Aggravated stalking; violation
of injunction or court order.
637
784.048(7) 3rd Aggravated stalking; violation
of court order.
638
784.07(2)(d) 1st Aggravated battery on law
enforcement officer.
639
784.074(1)(a) 1st Aggravated battery on sexually
violent predators facility
staff.
Page 47 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
640
784.08(2)(a) 1st Aggravated battery on a person
65 years of age or older.
641
784.081(1) 1st Aggravated battery on specified
official or employee.
642
784.082(1) 1st Aggravated battery by detained
person on visitor or other
detainee.
643
784.083(1) 1st Aggravated battery on code
inspector.
644
787.025(2)(b) 2nd Luring or enticing a child;
second or subsequent offense.
645
787.025(2)(c) 2nd Luring or enticing a child with
a specified prior conviction.
646
787.06(3)(a)2. 1st Human trafficking using
coercion for labor and services
of an adult.
647
787.06(3)(e)2. 1st Human trafficking using
Page 48 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
coercion for labor and services
by the transfer or transport of
an adult from outside Florida
to within the state.
648
790.07(4) 1st Specified weapons violation
subsequent to previous
conviction of s. 790.07(1) or
(2).
649
790.16(1) 1st Discharge of a machine gun
under specified circumstances.
650
790.165(2) 2nd Manufacture, sell, possess, or
deliver hoax bomb.
651
790.165(3) 2nd Possessing, displaying, or
threatening to use any hoax
bomb while committing or
attempting to commit a felony.
652
790.166(3) 2nd Possessing, selling, using, or
attempting to use a hoax weapon
of mass destruction.
653
Page 49 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
790.166(4) 2nd Possessing, displaying, or
threatening to use a hoax
weapon of mass destruction
while committing or attempting
to commit a felony.
654
790.23 1st,PBL Possession of a firearm by a
person who qualifies for the
penalty enhancements provided
for in s. 874.04.
655
794.08(4) 3rd Female genital mutilation;
consent by a parent, guardian,
or a person in custodial
authority to a victim younger
than 18 years of age.
656
796.05(1) 1st Live on earnings of a
prostitute; 2nd offense.
657
796.05(1) 1st Live on earnings of a
prostitute; 3rd and subsequent
offense.
658
800.04(5)(c)1. 2nd Lewd or lascivious molestation;
Page 50 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
victim younger than 12 years of
age; offender younger than 18
years of age.
659
800.04(5)(c)2. 2nd Lewd or lascivious molestation;
victim 12 years of age or older
but younger than 16 years of
age; offender 18 years of age
or older.
660
800.04(5)(e) 1st Lewd or lascivious molestation;
victim 12 years of age or older
but younger than 16 years;
offender 18 years or older;
prior conviction for specified
sex offense.
661
806.01(2) 2nd Maliciously damage structure by
fire or explosive.
662
810.02(3)(a) 2nd Burglary of occupied dwelling;
unarmed; no assault or battery.
663
810.02(3)(b) 2nd Burglary of unoccupied
dwelling; unarmed; no assault
Page 51 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
or battery.
664
810.02(3)(d) 2nd Burglary of occupied
conveyance; unarmed; no assault
or battery.
665
810.02(3)(e) 2nd Burglary of authorized
emergency vehicle.
666
812.014(2)(a)1. 1st Property stolen, valued at
$100,000 or more or a
semitrailer deployed by a law
enforcement officer; property
stolen while causing other
property damage; 1st degree
grand theft.
667
812.014(2)(b)2. 2nd Property stolen, cargo valued
at less than $50,000, grand
theft in 2nd degree.
668
812.014(2)(b)3. 2nd Property stolen, emergency
medical equipment; 2nd degree
grand theft.
669
Page 52 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
812.014(2)(b)4. 2nd Property stolen, law
enforcement equipment from
authorized emergency vehicle.
670
812.014(2)(g) 2nd Grand theft; second degree;
firearm with previous
conviction of s.
812.014(2)(c)5.
671
812.0145(2)(a) 1st Theft from person 65 years of
age or older; $50,000 or more.
672
812.019(2) 1st Stolen property; initiates,
organizes, plans, etc., the
theft of property and traffics
in stolen property.
673
812.131(2)(a) 2nd Robbery by sudden snatching.
674
812.133(2)(b) 1st Carjacking; no firearm, deadly
weapon, or other weapon.
675
817.034(4)(a)1. 1st Communications fraud, value
greater than $50,000.
676
Page 53 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
817.234(8)(a) 2nd Solicitation of motor vehicle
accident victims with intent to
defraud.
677
817.234(9) 2nd Organizing, planning, or
participating in an intentional
motor vehicle collision.
678
817.234(11)(c) 1st Insurance fraud; property value
$100,000 or more.
679
817.2341 1st Making false entries of
(2)(b) & material fact or false
(3)(b) statements regarding property
values relating to the solvency
of an insuring entity which are
a significant cause of the
insolvency of that entity.
680
817.418(2)(a) 3rd Offering for sale or
advertising personal protective
equipment with intent to
defraud.
681
817.504(1)(a) 3rd Offering or advertising a
Page 54 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
vaccine with intent to defraud.
682
817.535(2)(a) 3rd Filing false lien or other
unauthorized document.
683
817.611(2)(b) 2nd Traffic in or possess 15 to 49
counterfeit credit cards or
related documents.
684
825.102(3)(b) 2nd Neglecting an elderly person or
disabled adult causing great
bodily harm, disability, or
disfigurement.
685
825.103(3)(b) 2nd Exploiting an elderly person or
disabled adult and property is
valued at $10,000 or more, but
less than $50,000.
686
827.03(2)(b) 2nd Neglect of a child causing
great bodily harm, disability,
or disfigurement.
687
827.04(3) 3rd Impregnation of a child under
16 years of age by person 21
Page 55 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
years of age or older.
688
827.071(2) & (3) 2nd Use or induce a child in a
sexual performance, or promote
or direct such performance.
689
827.071(4) 2nd Possess with intent to promote
any photographic material,
motion picture, etc., which
includes child sexual abuse
material pornography.
690
837.05(2) 3rd Giving false information about
alleged capital felony to a law
enforcement officer.
691
838.015 2nd Bribery.
692
838.016 2nd Unlawful compensation or reward
for official behavior.
693
838.021(3)(a) 2nd Unlawful harm to a public
servant.
694
838.22 2nd Bid tampering.
Page 56 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
695
843.0855(2) 3rd Impersonation of a public
officer or employee.
696
843.0855(3) 3rd Unlawful simulation of legal
process.
697
843.0855(4) 3rd Intimidation of a public
officer or employee.
698
847.0135(3) 3rd Solicitation of a child, via a
computer service, to commit an
unlawful sex act.
699
847.0135(4) 2nd Traveling to meet a minor to
commit an unlawful sex act.
700
872.06 2nd Abuse of a dead human body.
701
874.05(2)(b) 1st Encouraging or recruiting
person under 13 to join a
criminal gang; second or
subsequent offense.
702
874.10 1st,PBL Knowingly initiates, organizes,
Page 57 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
plans, finances, directs,
manages, or supervises criminal
gang-related activity.
703
893.13(1)(c)1. 1st Sell, manufacture, or deliver
cocaine (or other drug
prohibited under s.
893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d),
(2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5.)
within 1,000 feet of a child
care facility, school, or
state, county, or municipal
park or publicly owned
recreational facility or
community center.
704
893.13(1)(e)1. 1st Sell, manufacture, or deliver
cocaine or other drug
prohibited under s.
893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d),
(2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5.,
within 1,000 feet of property
used for religious services or
a specified business site.
705
Page 58 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
893.13(4)(a) 1st Use or hire of minor; deliver
to minor other controlled
substance.
706
893.135(1)(a)1. 1st Trafficking in cannabis, more
than 25 lbs., less than 2,000
lbs.
707
893.135 1st Trafficking in cocaine, more
(1)(b)1.a. than 28 grams, less than 200
grams.
708
893.135 1st Trafficking in illegal drugs,
(1)(c)1.a. more than 4 grams, less than 14
grams.
709
893.135 1st Trafficking in hydrocodone, 28
(1)(c)2.a. grams or more, less than 50
grams.
710
893.135 1st Trafficking in hydrocodone, 50
(1)(c)2.b. grams or more, less than 100
grams.
711
893.135 1st Trafficking in oxycodone, 7
Page 59 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
(1)(c)3.a. grams or more, less than 14
grams.
712
893.135 1st Trafficking in oxycodone, 14
(1)(c)3.b. grams or more, less than 25
grams.
713
893.135 1st Trafficking in fentanyl, 4
(1)(c)4.b.(I) grams or more, less than 14
grams.
714
893.135 1st Trafficking in phencyclidine,
(1)(d)1.a. 28 grams or more, less than 200
grams.
715
893.135(1)(e)1. 1st Trafficking in methaqualone,
200 grams or more, less than 5
kilograms.
716
893.135(1)(f)1. 1st Trafficking in amphetamine, 14
grams or more, less than 28
grams.
717
893.135 1st Trafficking in flunitrazepam, 4
(1)(g)1.a. grams or more, less than 14
Page 60 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
grams.
718
893.135 1st Trafficking in gamma-
(1)(h)1.a. hydroxybutyric acid (GHB), 1
kilogram or more, less than 5
kilograms.
719
893.135 1st Trafficking in 1,4-Butanediol,
(1)(j)1.a. 1 kilogram or more, less than 5
kilograms.
720
893.135 1st Trafficking in Phenethylamines,
(1)(k)2.a. 10 grams or more, less than 200
grams.
721
893.135 1st Trafficking in synthetic
(1)(m)2.a. cannabinoids, 280 grams or
more, less than 500 grams.
722
893.135 1st Trafficking in synthetic
(1)(m)2.b. cannabinoids, 500 grams or
more, less than 1,000 grams.
723
893.135 1st Trafficking in n-benzyl
(1)(n)2.a. phenethylamines, 14 grams or
Page 61 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
more, less than 100 grams.
724
893.1351(2) 2nd Possession of place for
trafficking in or manufacturing
of controlled substance.
725
896.101(5)(a) 3rd Money laundering, financial
transactions exceeding $300 but
less than $20,000.
726
896.104(4)(a)1. 3rd Structuring transactions to
evade reporting or registration
requirements, financial
transactions exceeding $300 but
less than $20,000.
727
943.0435(4)(c) 2nd Sexual offender vacating
permanent residence; failure to
comply with reporting
requirements.
728
943.0435(8) 2nd Sexual offender; remains in
state after indicating intent
to leave; failure to comply
with reporting requirements.
Page 62 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
729
943.0435(9)(a) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to
comply with reporting
requirements.
730
943.0435(13) 3rd Failure to report or providing
false information about a
sexual offender; harbor or
conceal a sexual offender.
731
943.0435(14) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to
report and reregister; failure
to respond to address
verification; providing false
registration information.
732
944.607(9) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to
comply with reporting
requirements.
733
944.607(10)(a) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to
submit to the taking of a
digitized photograph.
734
944.607(12) 3rd Failure to report or providing
Page 63 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
false information about a
sexual offender; harbor or
conceal a sexual offender.
735
944.607(13) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to
report and reregister; failure
to respond to address
verification; providing false
registration information.
736
985.4815(10) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to
submit to the taking of a
digitized photograph.
737
985.4815(12) 3rd Failure to report or providing
false information about a
sexual offender; harbor or
conceal a sexual offender.
738
985.4815(13) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to
report and reregister; failure
to respond to address
verification; providing false
registration information.
739
Page 64 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
740 Section 19. Paragraph (c) of subsection (8) of section
741 948.06, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
742 948.06 Violation of probation or community control;
743 revocation; modification; continuance; failure to pay
744 restitution or cost of supervision.—
745 (8)
746 (c) For purposes of this section, the term "qualifying
747 offense" means any of the following:
748 1. Kidnapping or attempted kidnapping under s. 787.01,
749 false imprisonment of a child under the age of 13 under s.
750 787.02(3), or luring or enticing a child under s. 787.025(2)(b)
751 or (c).
752 2. Murder or attempted murder under s. 782.04, attempted
753 felony murder under s. 782.051, or manslaughter under s. 782.07.
754 3. Aggravated battery or attempted aggravated battery
755 under s. 784.045.
756 4. Sexual battery or attempted sexual battery under s.
757 794.011(2), (3), (4), or (8)(b) or (c).
758 5. Lewd or lascivious battery or attempted lewd or
759 lascivious battery under s. 800.04(4), lewd or lascivious
760 molestation under s. 800.04(5)(b) or (c)2., lewd or lascivious
761 conduct under s. 800.04(6)(b), lewd or lascivious exhibition
762 under s. 800.04(7)(b), or lewd or lascivious exhibition on
763 computer under s. 847.0135(5)(b).
764 6. Robbery or attempted robbery under s. 812.13,
Page 65 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
765 carjacking or attempted carjacking under s. 812.133, or home
766 invasion robbery or attempted home invasion robbery under s.
767 812.135.
768 7. Lewd or lascivious offense upon or in the presence of
769 an elderly or disabled person or attempted lewd or lascivious
770 offense upon or in the presence of an elderly or disabled person
771 under s. 825.1025.
772 8. Sexual performance by a child or attempted sexual
773 performance by a child under s. 827.071.
774 9. Computer pornography under s. 847.0135(2) or (3),
775 transmission of child sexual abuse material pornography under s.
776 847.0137, or selling or buying of minors under s. 847.0145.
777 10. Poisoning food or water under s. 859.01.
778 11. Abuse of a dead human body under s. 872.06.
779 12. Any burglary offense or attempted burglary offense
780 that is either a first degree felony or second degree felony
781 under s. 810.02(2) or (3).
782 13. Arson or attempted arson under s. 806.01(1).
783 14. Aggravated assault under s. 784.021.
784 15. Aggravated stalking under s. 784.048(3), (4), (5), or
785 (7).
786 16. Aircraft piracy under s. 860.16.
787 17. Unlawful throwing, placing, or discharging of a
788 destructive device or bomb under s. 790.161(2), (3), or (4).
789 18. Treason under s. 876.32.
Page 66 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
790 19. Any offense committed in another jurisdiction which
791 would be an offense listed in this paragraph if that offense had
792 been committed in this state.
793 Section 20. Paragraph (e) of subsection (3) and subsection
794 (10) of section 960.03, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
795 960.03 Definitions; ss. 960.01-960.28.—As used in ss.
796 960.01-960.28, unless the context otherwise requires, the term:
797 (3) "Crime" means:
798 (e) A violation of s. 827.071, s. 847.0135, s. 847.0137,
799 or s. 847.0138, related to online sexual exploitation and child
800 sexual abuse material pornography.
801 (10) "Identified victim of child sexual abuse material
802 pornography" means any person who, while under the age of 18, is
803 depicted in any image or movie of child sexual abuse material
804 pornography and who is identified through a report generated by
805 a law enforcement agency and provided to the National Center for
806 Missing and Exploited Children's Child Victim Identification
807 Program.
808 Section 21. Paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of section
809 960.197, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
810 960.197 Assistance to victims of online sexual
811 exploitation and child sexual abuse material pornography.—
812 (1) Notwithstanding the criteria set forth in s. 960.13
813 for crime victim compensation awards, the department may award
814 compensation for counseling and other mental health services to
Page 67 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 245, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
815 treat psychological injury or trauma to:
816 (b) Any person who, while younger than age 18, was
817 depicted in any image or movie, regardless of length, of child
818 sexual abuse material pornography as defined in s. 847.001, who
819 has been identified by a law enforcement agency or the National
820 Center for Missing and Exploited Children as an identified
821 victim of child sexual abuse material pornography, who suffers
822 psychiatric or psychological injury as a direct result of the
823 crime, and who does not otherwise sustain a personal injury or
824 death.
825 Section 22. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
826
Page 68 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb245 -02-er